Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 19 Conduct of Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies
17-19-13.
Exhibition of machines for instructional purposes.

The local board may designate suitable and adequate times and places where optical scan voting equipment and sample ballots showing titles of offices to be filled and, so far as practicable, the names of candidates to be voted for at the next election shall be exhibited for the purpose of giving instructions as to the manner of casting a vote to all voters who apply. No optical scan precinct count unit that is to be used in an election shall be used for the instruction after it has been prepared and sealed for the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 7; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-14

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 24, § 1.

17-19-14.
Preparation of voting equipment for election — Testing.

Prior to any election at which optical scan precinct count units are to be used, the secretary of state shall prepare the layout and format of the computer ballot in conjunction with the voting equipment vendor under contract with the state. The secretary of state shall be responsible for the coding and layout of all computer ballots to be used in each election under contract, including the printing of the ballot and the preparation of the device to ensure that the ballots are compatible with the device, and shall transfer all information relative to the ballot and its preparation to the state board.

Subsequently, the state board, in conjunction with the voter equipment vendor under contract with the state, shall be responsible for the testing of the programmed memory cartridge, the testing of each unit for logic and accuracy, and the set up of each optical scan precinct unit at each polling place. The state board of elections shall determine, and document on the forms provided for that purpose, the fact that the programmed memory cartridges for the optical scan precinct count units are in good working order, that the daily counter is at zero, and all of the candidates’ counters are set at zero and record no vote for any candidate.

The state board of elections, in conjunction with the voting equipment vendor under contract with the state, shall publicly conduct these tests on each programmed cartridge for each optical scan precinct count unit to be used for the election. This testing shall be made as near to the time of the election as is feasible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 14; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 9; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-16

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 9; P.L. 1948, ch. 2151, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-17

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 3, effective January 1, 2015; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 3, effective January 1, 2015.

17-19-16.
State election inspectors — Appointment — Duties — Training — Compensation.

The state board may appoint and issue commissions to qualified electors of this state to be election inspectors assigned to some or all election polling places. On the day before any election, the state board may assign an election inspector to one or more polling place as the state board may determine. Each election inspector shall receive a sum, not exceeding sixty dollars ($60.00), to be fixed by the state board for each election at which the inspector serves. Each election inspector shall hold office at the pleasure of the state board, and shall observe the conduct of the elections at which the inspector is assigned to serve, and immediately report to the state board any irregularities the inspector may observe. The state inspectors shall also perform any other and further duties that may be assigned to the inspectors by the state board, and may be required to attend a training session conducted by the state board, for attendance at which the inspector shall be entitled to receive an additional twenty-five dollars ($25.00); provided, that the inspector is assigned to the performance of duties on election day and actually performs those duties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 8; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1244, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3203, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-15

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 201, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 289, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8.

17-19-17.
Custody of optical scan precinct count units and voting booths — Duties of local boards — Posting of sample ballots.

Each local board shall be responsible for safeguarding the optical scan precinct count units and voting booths delivered to it, and shall properly and safely locate the optical scan precinct count units in the polling places where they are to be used. The local board shall also be responsible for the storage of all voting booths assigned to them, and shall cause the voting booths to be delivered and picked up at the polling places in which they are to be used. The local board shall cause the keys of the voting equipment to be delivered to the warden of the elective meeting at which optical scan precinct count units are to be used at least half an hour before the opening of the polls. The key or keys of each optical scan precinct count unit shall be placed in a sealed envelope upon which shall be written or printed the number and location of the optical scan precinct count unit, and any other information or certification required pursuant to regulations promulgated by the state board of elections. The envelope shall be opened by the warden in the presence of the other election officers. The custody of the voting equipment shall remain with the local board up to the time of the delivery of the keys to the warden, and the local board shall be held fully responsible for any damage or injury to any voting equipment while it is in its custody, and for the failure to have voting equipment ready for use at the time of the opening of the polls. The local board shall cause the sample ballots to be posted in a conspicuous place in each polling place, outside the guard rail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 14; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 9; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-19

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-17

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-18.
Examination of voting equipment prior to opening of polls.

The warden shall, in company with the clerk and supervisors, before the opening of the polls, unlock each compartment of the optical scan precinct count unit to assure that no computer ballots are contained in any compartment. The warden shall also examine the computer ballot and compare it with the sample ballot. The warden shall determine, as far as he or she may do so without operating the optical scan precinct count unit, that the unit is in good order and ready for the use of the voters. He or she shall then close and lock each compartment of the optical scan precinct count unit. The warden shall open the polling place by following the instructions provided with the optical scan precinct count unit and carefully examine each vote total on the printed tape obtained from the optical scan precinct count unit and determine that no vote is registered on the tape for any candidate or question. The warden shall then declare the polls open.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 15; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-21

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-18

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-19.
Custody of machines during voting.

During the time that the polls are open, and until the optical scan precinct count unit and voted computer ballots are finally locked and sealed and the removable keys thereof sealed up for transmission to the state board as provided in this chapter, the optical scan precinct count units, memory cartridges, and voted computer ballots shall remain in the care and custody of the warden, who shall see that the voting equipment is not defaced or injured by any voter or any other person. During the entire time in which the polls are open for voting, the ballot compartments shall be kept closed and locked; provided, that the emergency bin compartment slot shall be opened as provided in §

17-19-20

. The vote totals are not to be printed under any circumstances during the time the polls are open for voting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 15; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-22

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-19

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-20.
Repair or replacement of defective machines.

If an optical scan precinct count unit becomes out of order, the warden shall notify the voting equipment technician assigned to respond to those calls. While repairing or otherwise attending to the repair of any voting machine equipment, the voting equipment technician shall display, in a visible manner and on his or her clothing, an identification furnished by the state board of elections, and which shall include, whenever possible, a photograph of the voting equipment technician. In the event that repairs are made to the voting equipment, the voting equipment technician shall make the repairs in the presence of a bi-partisan pair of election officials, and the technician shall note on the official document provided the nature and extent of the repairs made by the technician, the number of the optical scan precinct count unit, the time required to make the repairs, and the probable cause of the failure to operate properly. If any optical scan precinct count unit cannot be repaired by the technician within a period of thirty (30) minutes, the technician and the board shall at once substitute another optical scan precinct count unit for the out of order unit, and at the close of the polls the records of both units shall be taken. During the time in which the optical scan precinct count unit is not accepting ballots, the warden shall, in the presence of the clerk, unlock the emergency bin compartment of the optical scan unit and shall direct voters to place their voted ballots into that compartment. Upon the repair of the unit, the warden, in the presence of the clerk, shall remove the ballots, deposit them in the appropriate ballot slot for counting by the unit, and shall then close and lock the emergency compartment slot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 15; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-23

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-20

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-21.
Arrangement of polling places — Election officials — Police officers.

The polling places shall be established, equipped, and furnished with the paraphernalia necessary for the conduct of each election, by the officers and in the manner provided by this title. There shall be placed, outside each polling place, a clearly marked sign to be provided by the state board of elections indicating the location of the polling place. This sign shall be of a conspicuous nature and shall be visible from the street. The area within which the balloting is conducted shall be arranged with a guard rail having one place for entrance and another place for exit. The rail shall be placed so that only persons admitted inside the rail can approach within five (5) feet of any voting booth or optical-scan precinct-count unit. The voting booths and optical-scan precinct-count unit shall be placed so that the warden and the clerk shall always have a clear view of the front of each voting booth and the optical-scan unit. It shall be the duty of the warden to direct the location of the voting equipment in relation to the guard rail and the posts of the warden and the clerk so as to enforce the requirements of this section.

One bipartisan pair of supervisors, the clerk, and the warden shall be stationed, in that order, along the guard rail so that a voter desiring to cast a ballot will pass first in front of the bipartisan pair, then in front of the clerk, and finally in front of the warden. A second bipartisan pair shall be stationed within the guard rail and shall be available to relieve the first bipartisan pair or the clerk and to assist voters within the limits prescribed by this title. The second bipartisan pair, when not engaged in the preceding duties, shall watch the voters in and about the voting equipment and shall call to the attention of the warden any violation, or circumstance suggesting a violation, of the provisions of this title.

The chiefs of police of cities and towns, and town sergeants of towns having no chief of police, shall detail a certain number of police officers to each polling place as may be requested by the local board. The police officers shall preserve order at each polling place and within two hundred feet (200´) of the polling place. It shall be the duty of every police officer or other peace officer or town or police constable to arrest without warrant any person detected in the act of violating the provisions of this chapter, but no arrest shall be made without the approval of the warden.

The election officials provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be provided with, and shall be required to prominently display upon their persons, identification badges that shall designate that person as an election official. Powers and duties of all designated election officials at polls shall be posted in a conspicuous and prominent location within the voting place, preferably with the posted sample ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 16; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, §§ 10, 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 23; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

17-15-23

,

17-19-20

,

17-19-24

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-21

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 27; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 27.

17-19-21.1.
Polling place bake sales.

Bake sales may be held at polling places as long as conduct does not interfere with the orderly conduct of the scheduled election.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 41, § 1.

17-19-22.
Party checkers, runners, and watchers.

The officers required to furnish and equip any voting place shall also provide a table in the room where the voting is conducted, outside the enclosed space near the first bipartisan pair of supervisors, at which a representative of each recognized political party bearing credentials signed by the proper ward or town committee chairperson, shall be allowed to sit for the purpose of keeping track of those who are voting, and these representatives, who shall be known as “checkers,” may be changed during the day. A representative, known as a “runner,” of each of the parties shall be allowed to come to the table at frequent intervals for the purpose of taking whatever list or memoranda the checkers may wish to give the runner. A representative of each recognized political party bearing credentials signed by the proper ward or town committee chairperson, shall also be allowed outside the enclosed place to observe the voting and assist the checkers, and these representatives shall be known as “watchers.” The watchers and any election official shall have the right to challenge the right to vote of any person offering himself or herself as a voter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-26

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-22

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 400, § 2.

17-19-22.1.
Bilingual poll workers.

Any board which determines that it requires ballots printed in a language other than English, pursuant to the provisions of §

17-19-54(a)

, shall provide at each polling place at least one individual who is fluent in the language for each language for which those ballots were sought. Such person or persons shall be available to assist voters in casting their ballots, upon request by the individual or at the direction of the warden, during all hours of poll operations. In addition, such person or persons shall otherwise comply with the provisions of §

17-19-26.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 396, § 1.

17-19-23.
Wardens and supervisors — Powers and duties.

The wardens shall:

Have general supervision of the voting place;

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 341, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 364, § 1.]

Assign and reassign and relieve the bipartisan pairs of supervisors, as the efficient conduct of the election may require;

Access the voting list and set it before the bipartisan pairs, if it has not been divided in sections, or set each section before a bipartisan pair where it has been divided in sections, immediately preceding the opening of the polls;

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 341, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 364, § 1.]

Be vigilant and responsible to prevent any voter from voting more than once;

Cause to be established a single line of persons desiring to vote and enlist the assistance of the supervisors and the police in attendance to maintain that line;

As far as consistent with their other duties, station themselves at the entrance to the polling area and prevent any person from entering the designated voting area, except under the authority of this chapter, and prevent any person from entering that area for the purpose of voting until that person’s name has been announced and that person’s identity certified according to law by the supervisors in charge of the voting list, and shall prevent any voter from departing the enclosed space while in possession of his or her computer ballot. A notice shall be provided by the state board and posted in a conspicuous place advising that it is a felony for a voter to leave the enclosed area while in possession of his or her ballot. The voter has the option of casting his or her ballot or surrendering the ballot to the warden whereby it will be marked void;

Cause to be removed or arrested any person or official who commits a violation of the election law in their presence or disturbs the conduct of the voting; provided, that they shall not cause any removal or arrest without the approval of the election inspector, unless the clerk agrees with the wardens that the person or official should be arrested or removed;

Have the power to administer oaths as required by this title, and to attest the oaths by signature in proof of the administration of the oaths.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 10; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-20

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-23

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1958 (s.s.), ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2016, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 364, § 1.

17-19-23.1.
Certification and appointment of election officials.

All persons who attend and complete a program of instruction for election officials under §

17-7-5(a)(6)

shall be issued a certificate by the board of elections. In addition to the compensation to which they are otherwise entitled, these persons shall also be entitled to receive the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon the performance of their duties on election day. The certificate shall be valid for a period of one year; provided, that the certificate shall be revocable at the discretion of the board of elections if the board believes that new developments have occurred requiring the re-certification of these persons.

Election officials shall, whenever practicable, be appointed from lists of certificated persons.

The board of elections shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 523, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 531, § 1.

17-19-23.2.
Compensation of election officials.

Cities and towns are authorized to compensate moderators, clerks, inspectors, supervisors and any other election official at a daily rate in excess of any statutory allowable amount. Any excess shall be the responsibility of the authorizing city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 74, § 1.

17-19-23.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 383, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 446, § 1, effective July 8, 2008. For comparable provisions, see §

17-11-12.1

.

17-19-24.
Procedure for voting.

Each person desiring to vote shall provide proof of identification as required by §

17-19-24.2

and state his or her name and residence, including that person’s street address, if he or she has any, to the pair of bi-partisan supervisors, who shall then announce the name and residence in a loud and distinct voice, clear and audible.

A bipartisan pair shall locate the voter’s name on the certified voting list for the voting district. Upon finding the voter’s name on the certified voting list for the district, the voter shall sign their name on the line next to their printed name on the certified voter list, and the bipartisan pair shall initial the certified voter list in the place provided next to the voter’s signature entered on the certified list of voters. The bipartisan pair shall also make a proper notation on the certified voter list that the applicant has voted in the election. If the bipartisan pair cannot locate the voter’s name on the certified voting list for the voting district the bipartisan pair shall direct the voter to the clerk who shall review the certified list for the city or town and determine if the voter is registered to vote and in which voting district they are eligible to vote. The bipartisan pair of supervisors shall provide the voter with the appropriate computer ballot and security sleeve. The warden shall direct the voter to the voting booth which the voter shall use, and unless the voter needs instruction or assistance as provided in this chapter, the voter shall cast his or her vote, and if he or she desires place the voted computer ballot in a security sleeve, and shall proceed to the optical scan precinct count unit and shall personally place his or her voted ballot into the designated ballot slot on the unit, and after doing so, shall leave the enclosure at once. No voter shall remain within the voting booth longer than ten (10) minutes, and if the voter refuses to leave after the lapse of ten (10) minutes, the voter shall be removed from the voting booth by order of the warden. Except for the election officials and the election inspector, not more than two (2) voters in excess of the number of voting booths shall be permitted within the enclosed space at any time.

The optical scan precinct count unit shall be programmed to return a ballot to the voter if the voter has cast votes for more persons than which he or she is entitled to cast. The warden, by reading the message given on the optical scan precinct count unit, must advise the voter of the fact that the ballot has been over-voted. The voter will be instructed by the warden to remove his or her own ballot from the optical scan precinct count unit ballot slot. The warden will then ask the voter to surrender the ballot as void and receive a new ballot. If the voter agrees, the voter will make additional marks on the ballot so as not to identify the actual votes intended by the voter for the ballot. The ballot will be marked void by the warden and deposited in the receptacle for void ballots provided at the polling place. If the voter insists on casting the over-voted ballot, he or she will be advised that all races, other than the over-voted race, will be counted by the optical scan precinct count unit, and if he or she still insists, the warden will manually override the appropriate control on the unit and allow for the ballot to be entered and counted for all races other than the over-voted race.

In the event a voter incorrectly marks a ballot by indicating his or her choices other than in the spaces provided for them, the ballot will be returned to the voter. The warden, by reading the message given on the optical scan precinct count unit, must advise the voter of the fact that the ballot has been marked incorrectly. The voter will be instructed by the warden to remove his or her own ballot from the optical scan precinct unit ballot slot. The warden will then advise the voter to surrender the ballot as void and receive a new ballot. If the voter agrees, the voter will make additional marks on the ballot so as not to identify the actual votes intended by the voter for the ballot. The ballot will be marked void by the warden and deposited in the receptacle for void ballots provided at the polling place. The warden will then provide for the instruction of the voter on the correct manner of marking his or her vote and the voter will be issued a new ballot. If the voter insists on casting the incorrectly marked ballot, the warden will manually override the appropriate control on the optical scan precinct count unit and allow for the ballot to be accepted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 16; P.L. 1938, ch. 2640, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 12; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-25

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-24

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 15; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2004, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 201, § 1.

17-19-24.1.
Provisional voting under the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

If an individual’s name does not appear on the certified voting list as provided for in §

17-19-24(b)

and the individual is eligible to vote in an election for federal office or an election official asserts that the individual is not eligible to vote in the district in which the individual desires to vote, then the individual shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot as provided in Section 302 of the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252) [42 U.S.C. § 15481].

Provisional ballots provided for in this section shall be cast in accordance with rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the state board of elections in accordance with the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252) [42 U.S.C. § 15301 et seq.].

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 234, § 2.

17-19-24.2.
Voter identification.

Beginning on January 1, 2012, any person claiming to be a registered and eligible voter who desires to vote at a primary election, special election, or general election shall provide proof of identity. For purposes of this section, proof of identity shall be valid if unexpired or expired no more than six (6) months prior to voting, and shall include:

A valid and current document showing a photograph of the person to whom the document was issued, including without limitation:

Rhode Island driver’s license;

Rhode Island voter identification card;

United States passport;

Identification card issued by a United States educational institution;

United States military identification card;

Identification card issued by the United States or the State of Rhode Island;

Government issued medical card.

A valid and current document without a photograph of the person to whom the document was issued, including without limitation:

Birth certificate;

Social security card;

Government issued medical card.

From and after January 1, 2014, any person claiming to be a registered and eligible voter who desires to vote at a primary election, special election, or general election shall provide proof of identity listed in subsection (a)(1).

No later than January 1, 2012, Rhode Island voter identification cards will be issued upon request, and at no expense to the voters, at locations and in accordance with procedures established by rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of state. The purpose of this section is to provide voter identification cards to those voters who do not possess the identification listed in subsection (a)(1).

If the person claiming to be a registered and eligible voter is unable to provide proof of identity as required in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) above, the person claiming to be a registered voter shall be allowed to vote a provisional ballot pursuant to §

17-19-24.3

upon completing a provisional ballot voter’s certificate and affirmation. The local board shall determine the validity of the provisional ballot pursuant to §

17-19-24.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 201, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 9.

17-19-24.3.
Provisional ballot procedures.

At all elections, a person claiming to be a registered and eligible voter, but who has failed to provide proof of identity pursuant to §

17-19-24.2

shall be allowed to vote a provisional ballot upon executing a provisional ballot voter’s application. All provisional ballots, together with a provisional ballot voter’s application, shall be placed in an envelope in the form prescribed by the state board and deposited in a ballot box.

The local board shall examine each provisional ballot application to determine if the signature matches the signature on the voter’s registration. If the local board determines that the signatures match, the provisional ballot shall count. If the local board determines that the signatures do not match, the provisional ballot shall not count and the ballot shall remain in the envelope containing the provisional ballot application and the envelope shall be marked “Rejected as Illegal”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 199, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 201, § 2.

17-19-25.
Certified voting list — Duty of bipartisan supervisor.

Immediately upon the close of the polls, the bipartisan pair of supervisors shall securely bind, tie, or seal the certified voting list in the manner that shall be required by the state board, and the supervisors shall affix thereon their certificate under oath that the marks within the certified voting list next to each voter’s name comprise one for each person who was permitted to pass before the warden and to cast a vote at the election, and that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief no person voted at the election who did not sign the certified voter list, and that each of the persons was identified in the manner provided by law before being permitted to vote. The bipartisan pair of supervisors shall then give the certified voter list to the warden, who shall deliver the list to the local board together with the affidavits and materials used at the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 3.

17-19-26.
Models for instruction — Assistance to voters in marking their ballot.

Any person desiring information or assistance in voting on election day shall apply to the warden, who shall instruct the person by the use of the sample ballots. If a voter needs assistance in casting his or her vote itself, and requests this assistance, the warden shall direct the second or additional bipartisan pair to instruct or assist the voter. The bipartisan pair shall enter the voting booth with the voter and instruct the voter in the marking of his or her ballot, and if the voter has no further need of them, they shall both withdraw before the voter casts his or her vote. If, the voter is unable to mark his or her ballot, the bipartisan pair shall mark the ballot for the voter as he or she directs, but unless ordered to do so by a court of competent jurisdiction, neither member of the pair shall disclose for whom and how the voter voted. In every case of this nature, both members of the bipartisan pair shall enter and leave the voting booth together, and it shall be a violation of this chapter for either to enter or remain alone.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 16; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-37

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-26

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12.

17-19-26.1.
Voting assistance.

Any voter who requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, disability, or inability to read or write may be given assistance by a person of the voter’s choice, other than the voter’s employer or agent of that employer, or an officer or agent of the voter’s union.

Every voter who requires assistance pursuant to this section, and every person furnishing assistance to a voter pursuant to this section, shall make and file with the warden an affidavit in substantially the following form:

An affidavit will be made available only upon request by the voter to the warden in the polling place.

Every person who makes a false affidavit under this section shall be guilty of a felony.

Under the penalty prescribed by law, the “assistant” is prohibited from marking a vote on the computer ballot, unless otherwise requested by the voter who, due to a physical disability, is unable to mark his or her ballot.

No person may approach a voter and ask if he or she needs assistance, once the voter is within the voting place or waiting in line to vote or within fifty (50) feet of the entrance or entrances to the building as prescribed in §

17-19-49

.

AFFIDAVIT OF VOTER REQUIRING ASSISTANCE Under the penalty prescribed by law I hereby make affidavit that I, , of Print Name of Voter Street Address of Voter , hereby choose City/Town of Voter Print Name of Assistant to provide assistance to me because I am either blind, disabled or unable to read or write in the English language and do hereby certify that the person chosen to assist me is not my employer, or agent of my employer, or officer or agent of my union. Signature of Voter Under the penalty prescribed by law I hereby make affidavit that I, , of Print Name of Person Assisting Voter Street and City/Town Address of Person Assisting Voter having been chosen by Print Name of Voter to provide assistance to voter by reason of either blindness, disability or inability to read or write in the English language on the part of the voter, do hereby certify that I am not the voter's employer, or agent of that employer, or officer or agent of the voter's union. Signature of Person Assisting Voter Subscribed and sworn to on this day of A.D. 20. Signature of Warden Voter’s Ballot Application No.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 40; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 40.

17-19-27.
Challenge of identity as to right to vote.

Whenever the identity of any person offering to vote is challenged at the polling place, that person shall be permitted to vote only using a provisional ballot as defined in §

17-19-24.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, §§ 22, 26; P.L. 1952, ch. 2897, § 6; G.L. 1956, §§ 17-10-37, 17-10-38; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-27

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 15; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 9; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 52; P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 3.

17-19-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 24; P.L. 1942, ch. 1211, § 1; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 8; P.L. 1952, ch. 2897, § 3; P.L. 1956, ch. 3746, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§ 17-10-33 — 17-10-35; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 134, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-28

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 8; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 4, effective July 4, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 4, effective July 7, 2006.

17-19-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 33; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-29

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 315, § 4, effective July 4, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 460, § 4, effective July 7, 2006.

17-19-30.
Voters who register by making a mark rather than signature.

Any voter who has registered by making his or her mark rather than his or her signature, or who shall be physically unable to sign his or her name at the time of offering himself or herself to vote, shall identify himself or herself with proof of identity as required under §

17-19-24.2

. They shall permit the voter to affix the voter’s mark on the electronic pollbook in their presence and shall record their approval on the electronic pollbook as in other cases.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 263, § 1.

17-19-31.
Irregular ballots.

Ballots voted for any person whose name does not appear on the ballot as a nominated candidate for office are referred to in this section as “irregular ballots.” In voting for presidential electors, a voter may vote an irregular ticket made up of the names of persons in nomination by different parties; or partly of names of persons in nomination and partly of names of persons not in nomination; or wholly of names of persons not in nomination by any party. Scanned images of the computer ballot containing the irregular ballot shall be stored digitally on physical electronic media in the optical-scan precinct-count unit. With that exception, no irregular ballot shall be voted for any person for any office whose name appears on the ballot as a nominated candidate for that office; any irregular ballot so voted shall not be counted. An irregular ballot must be cast in its appropriate place on the ballot, or it shall be void and not counted and no irregular ballots shall be counted at primaries; provided, that at any presidential primary, irregular ballots shall be counted for those persons whose names have been written in for the office of president. At the close of the polls, irregular ballots shall be packaged according to §

17-19-33

and shall be immediately delivered to the local board of canvassers. The local board shall receive the tape from the optical precinct-count unit containing printed images of each written name on the irregular ballots, or the physical electronic media containing images of the irregular ballots and record all write-in votes cast for all federal, state, and local races listed on the tape. The local board shall notify the state board of the results through a procedure promulgated by the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2195, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 318, § 13; P.L. 1940, ch. 818, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, §§ 36, 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-27

; G.L. 1956, §

17-19-31

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 205, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 12; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 12; P.L. 2016, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 190, § 1.